Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.30.020

Chapter not exclusive.

(1) A defective corporate action is not void or voidable solely as a result of a failure of authorization if ratified in accordance with RCW 23B.30.030 or validated in accordance with RCW 23B.30.080.

(2) Ratification under RCW 23B.30.030 or validation under RCW 23B.30.080 is not the exclusive means of ratifying or validating any defective corporate action, and the absence or failure of ratification or validation in accordance with this chapter does not, of itself, affect the validity or effectiveness of any corporate action properly ratified under common law or otherwise, nor does it create a presumption that any such corporate action is or was a defective corporate action or void or voidable.

[ 2017 c 28 s 2.]